Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. During the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  all lottery revenues available to
benefit the public purposes specified in Article  XV, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution,
that are in  excess of distributions or allocations required by law shall be maintained in the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund.
SECTION 2. All moneys in the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund as
of July 1, 2025, and thereafter are reserved to meet the commitments of sections 1  to 13 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025,
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 20,346,833
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 75,381,963
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $ 5,872,354
(4) Oregon Film and Video
Office......................................... $ 1,541,600
SECTION 4. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Admin-
istrative Services  Economic Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for the
State School Fund, the amount of $606,501,675.
SECTION 5. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund,  to the office of the Governor, the amount
of $5,213,172 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a
process for  allocating available moneys in the Administrative Services Economic Develop-
ment Fund on a quarterly basis to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to 13 of
this 2025 Act. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys  transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund are insufficient to  pay for the quarterly
allocations made by sections 1 to 13 of this  2025 Act or any other 2025 Act, prior to making
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 1
any other allocations pursuant to sections 1 to 13 of this  2025 Act, the department shall
satisfy lottery bond debt service obligations in the amount of $389,965,797 for  outstanding
lottery bonds.
(3) After the lottery bond debt service obligations described  in subsection (2) of this
section are satisfied, if the remaining  moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to
the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund are insufficient to pay for the
quarterly allocations made by sections 1 to  13 of this 2025 Act, the department shall reduce
the quarterly allocations not described in subsection (2) of this section  proportionately in
amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 7. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, the amount  of $389,965,797 for the purpose of paying, when due, the principal, in-
terest and premium, if any, on  outstanding lottery bonds, as described in section 6 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.547 (1) for  a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services for distribution to counties for economic development
activities as provided by ORS 461.547 is $59,783,760.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for  a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  to the Problem
Gambling Treatment Fund is $18,853,152.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding and in  lieu of the requirement in ORS 565.447 for a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the amount
allocated from the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund to the County Fair
Account established in ORS 565.445 is $5,744,348.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described in section 2 (3),
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 99 (2016)), as amended by section 23, chapter
57, Oregon Laws  2019, for a percentage-based transfer of moneys with an annual cap, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the amount allocated from  the Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund to the Outdoor School Education Fund is $48,060,583.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.543 (4) for  a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the amount
allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Sports Lot-
tery Account is $18,852,926.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding section 44, chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by
section 1, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2021, no moneys are  allocated from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund to  the Employer Incentive Fund for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025.
SECTION 14. There are allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to  the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lot-
tery Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans’ operations ................. $ 2,768,376
(2) Appeals and special advocacy ... $ 2,168,419
(3) Strategic partnership ................ $ 15,249,233
(4) Aging veterans’ services ........... $ 3,602,439
SECTION 15. There is allocated for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, the amount of $307,006 for
veterans’ employment apprenticeship outreach and coordination.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 2
SECTION 16. There is allocated for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission, the amount of $628,510
for veterans’ specialty courts.
SECTION 17. There are allocated for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund,  to the Oregon Health Authority, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) Veterans’ behavioral
health services ..........................  $ 2,879,455
(2) Veterans’ dental program ......... $ 3,519,334
SECTION 18. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  shall establish a
process for allocating  available moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund on a quarterly basis
to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 14 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
(2) If the moneys transferred from the  State Lottery Fund to the Veterans’ Services
Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations  under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall reduce the quarterly allocations proportionately  in amounts sufficient
to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 19. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 137.300, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
the Department of Revenue shall  distribute the moneys in the Criminal Fine Account es-
tablished by ORS 137.300 as specified in sections 20 to 24 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall establish a process for distributing available moneys
from the Criminal Fine Account on a monthly basis to fulfill the  biennial distributions made
by sections 20 to 24 of this 2025 Act.
(3) If the moneys from the Criminal Fine Account are insufficient to pay for  the monthly
distributions under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall  reduce the monthly
distributions proportionately in amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 20. There is allocated to the Department of Public  Safety Standards and
Training for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Criminal Fine Account, the
amount of $65,846,019 for the purpose of criminal justice training and standards operations.
SECTION 21. There are allocated  to the Department of Justice for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2025, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following  amounts for the following
purposes:
(1) Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Account ................ $ 14,289,302
(2) Creation and operation of a
statewide system of regional
assessment centers as
provided under ORS 418.746
to 418.796................................... $ 959,151
(3) Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account ............. $ 10,704,460
(4) Services to children eligible
for compensation under
ORS 147.390 and costs to
administer provision of
these services ........................... $ 811,868
SECTION 22.
There are allocated to the Department of Human Services for  the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for  the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Domestic Violence Fund
established in ORS 409.300
for the purpose of
ORS 409.292 (1)(a) to (c) ............ $ 2,850,674
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 3
(2) Sexual Assault Victims Fund .... $ 630,635
SECTION 23. There are allocated to the State Court Facilities  and Security Account es-
tablished under ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, from the Criminal Fine
Account, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
and emergency preparedness .... $ 5,087,487
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ....... $ 1,852,863
SECTION 24. There is allocated to the Department of Revenue for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2025, from the Criminal  Fine Account, the amount of $159,700 for administrative
costs of the department.
SECTION 24a. Notwithstanding section 26, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, and  ORS
137.300, amounts deposited in the Criminal Fine Account in the biennium  ending June 30,
2025, may not be distributed to or deposited in the General Fund by operation of those
sections of law.
SECTION 24b.
Notwithstanding ORS 137.300,  amounts deposited in the Criminal Fine
Account in the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, may not be distributed to  or deposited in the
General Fund by operation of ORS 137.300.
SECTION 25. (1) There  is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS
327.008, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the
amount of $43,568,275.
(2) There is allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority, for mental health treatment or for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early intervention and treatment
services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from  the Oregon Marijuana Account, the
amount of $21,784,137.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon  Health Authority, for the health systems division,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the  amount
of $5,446,034 for purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early intervention
and treatment services.
(4) There  is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount  of $192,330,671, for deposit into the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund.
(5) There is allocated to  the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July  1, 2025, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of
$16,338,103.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the percentage-based transfers of moneys
described in ORS 327.001 (4)(c), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the Department of
Education shall distribute the moneys in the Fund for Student  Success established by ORS
327.001 as follows:
(1) $1,109,828,482 to the Student Investment Account established in ORS 327.175;
(2) $559,443,881 to the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250;
and
(3) $550,384,601 to the Early Learning Account established in ORS 327.269.
SECTION 27.
In addition to transfers to the Tobacco  Enforcement Fund under ORS
293.537, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall make the following trans-
fers from the Tobacco Settlement Funds Account for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025:
(1) To the Oregon Health
Authority for expenses of
the Oregon Health Plan ............ $ 98,066,197
(2) To the Oregon Health
Authority for community
mental health programs ........... $ 15,312,457
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 4
(3) To the Department of
Education for physical
education related grants
authorized by ORS 329.501 ........ $ 3,100,000
(4) To the Department of
Justice for enforcement
activities authorized by
ORS 293.537............................... $ 2,846,553
SECTION 28.
 Section 24, chapter  598, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 11, chapter
106, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 24.  There are allocated to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established un-
der ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the fol-
lowing amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
[and emergency preparedness .......... $ 4,614,833]
and emergency preparedness .... $ 3,822,333
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ............. $ 3,326,651
SECTION 29.
 Section 25, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by  section 2, chapter 8,
Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 25.  (1) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $42,884 for the purpose of grants  under ORS
430.345 for the establishment,  operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse prevention,
early intervention and treatment services provided through a county.
(2) There is allocated to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability  Account established under ORS
414.815, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the  amount of
$1,300,000.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon State Police for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, from
the Criminal  Fine Account, the amount of $351,572 for the purpose of enforcing the laws relating
to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(4) There  is allocated to the Department of Corrections for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $0 for the purpose of planning, operating and main-
taining county  juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and alcohol programs.
Notwithstanding  ORS  137.300 (4), the grant to each county shall be based on the formula used to
determine the distribution of moneys under the Grant-in-Aid Program under ORS 423.530.
(5) There is allocated to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012, for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of [ $2,927,500] $0.
(6) There is allocated to the Intoxicated Driver  Program Fund created under ORS 813.270, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $4,323,000.
(7) There is allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the  Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $331,824 for the Emergency Medical Services and
Trauma Systems Program created under ORS 431A.085.
(8) There is allocated to the Department of Revenue for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $100,000 for administrative costs of  the department.
SECTION 30.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 6